Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3530
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-3529 to 71-3536:

(1) Department means the Radiological Emergency Preparedness Division within the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency under the Military Department;

(2) Radiological instrument includes, but is not limited to, radiological meters, radiological detectors and probes, radiological dosimeters, and radiological kits; and

(3) Responsible agency means any state or local governmental entity or private agency which owns radiological instruments or has agreed to be responsible for the replacement, repair, or calibration of such instruments.

Laws 2006, LB 787, § 2.